Arkansas, session 2025, HB1684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 10, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-10-140. Parents and Teachers Helping Students Succeed (PATHS) Act —
Definitions.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Parents and
Teachers Helping Students Succeed (PATHS) Act".
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Parent" means:
(A) A biological or adoptive parent of a student;
(B) A legal guardian of a student;
(C) A person standing in loco parentis to a student; or
(D) Another person with legal authority to act on behalf
of a student; and
(2) "School" means:
(A) A school in a public school district; or
(B) An open-enrollment public charter school.
(c) A parent shall be entitled to:
(1) Access all information that directly relates to his or her
*TNL079*
03-19-2025 14:28:12 TNL079

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1684
child under to the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. §
1232g, as it existed on January 1, 2025, from the school in which his or her
child is enrolled;
(2)(A) Review, upon request, all of the following that are used
in a classroom to which the parent's student is assigned, including while the
parent's student is participating in virtual or remote learning:
(i) Teaching materials;
(ii) Instructional materials;
(iii) Required textbooks;
(iv) Course syllabi;
(v) Lesson plans; and
(vi) Other teaching aids.
(B) A school may allow a parent to review materials under
subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section that are reasonably available:
(i) In person after the parent submits a request to
his or her student's school at least seventy-two (72) hours in advance; or
(ii)(a) In the form of a photocopy of the materials,
a mailed copy of a photocopy of the materials, or via email that includes a
digital file of the materials if it is reasonable for the school to make a
photocopy of the materials or a scanned file of the materials based on the
volume of the materials.
(b) The form in which a parent receives
materials under subdivision (c)(2)(B)(ii)(a) of this section shall be within
the discretion of the school in consultation with a parent;
(3)(A) Remove his or her student temporarily from a class
or other school activity if the class or other school activity conflicts
with his or her religious or moral beliefs or if he or she deems the class
or other school activity to espouse, promote, advance, or compel his or her
student to adopt a concept that constitutes prohibited indoctrination as
defined in § 6-16-156.
(B)(i) A parent who removes his or her student temporarily
from a class or other school activity under subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this
section shall present or deliver to the teacher of his or her child a written
statement that authorizes the temporary removal of his or her student from the
class or other school activity.
(ii) However, a parent shall not remove his or her
03-19-2025 14:28:12 TNL079

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1684
student temporarily from a class under subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section
in order to:
(a) Avoid the administration of a test to his
or her student; or
(b) Prevent his or her student from taking a
subject for the duration of the academic semester; and
(4) Gain access to a meeting of the following, except in cases
of an executive session or when prohibited by law or court order:
(A) The public school district board of directors of the
public school district in which his or her student is enrolled; or
(B) The governing body of the open-enrollment public
charter school in which his or her student is enrolled.
(d) A public school district board of directors and a governing body
of an open-enrollment public charter school shall:
(1)(A) Make available for review by parents, upon request, all
of the following that are reasonably available:
(i) Teaching materials;
(ii) Required textbooks;
(iii) Course syllabi;
(iv) Lesson plans; and
(v) Required tests scheduled for the year.
(B) A school may allow a parent to review materials under
subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section:
(i) In person after the parent submits a request to
his or her student's school at least seventy-two (72) hours in advance; or
(ii)(a) In the form of a photocopy of the materials,
a mailed copy of a photocopy of the materials, or via email that includes a
digital file of the scanned materials if it is reasonable for the school to
make a photocopy of the materials or a scanned file of the materials based on
the volume of the materials.
(b) The form in which a parent receives
materials under subdivision (d)(1)(B)(ii)(a) of this section shall be within
the discretion of the school in consultation with a parent;
(2)(A) Adopt procedures for notifying a student's parent within
twenty-four (24) hours, or the timeframe otherwise specified by state or
federal law, if there is a change in the services provided by the school or
03-19-2025 14:28:12 TNL079

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1684
monitoring related to the student's mental, emotional, or physical health or
well-being or the school's ability to provide a safe and supportive learning
environment for the student.
(B) Procedures adopted under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this
section shall reinforce the fundamental right of a parent to make decisions
regarding the upbringing and control of the parent's student by requiring
school personnel to:
(i) Encourage a student to discuss issues relating
to his or her well-being with the his or her parent; or
(ii) Facilitate discussion of the student's well-
being with the his or her parent.
(C) Procedures adopted under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this
section shall not prohibit a parent from accessing any of the education and
health records pertaining to the parent's student that are created,
maintained, or used by the school in which the parent's student is enrolled
and that the parent is entitled to access under the Family Educational Rights
and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, as it existed on January 1, 2025, or
other state or federal law; and
(3)(A) Not adopt procedures or student support forms that:
(i) Prohibit school personnel from notifying the
parent of a student regarding:
(a) The student's mental, emotional, or
physical health or well-being; or
(b) A change in related services or monitoring
as it pertains to the student; or
(ii) Encourage a student to withhold information
from his or her parent as it pertains to his or her mental, emotional, or
physical health or well-being or a change in related services or monitoring
as it pertains to him or her.
(B)(i) School personnel shall not discourage or prohibit
parental notification of and involvement in critical decisions that affect a
student's mental, emotional, or physical health or well-being.
(ii) However, a school may adopt procedures that
permit school personnel to withhold parental notification of information
described under subdivision (d)(3)(B)(i) of this section if a reasonably
prudent person would believe that the disclosure of the information could
03-19-2025 14:28:12 TNL079

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1684
result in abuse, abandonment, or neglect of a student or if disclosure is
prohibited by law.
(e)(1) A teacher employed by a school may control and discipline
students in his or her classroom and in other locations in which the teacher
is assigned to supervise.
(2) In order to provide an orderly and safe learning environment
for students, a teacher shall:
(A) Establish classroom rules of conduct;
(B) Establish and implement consequences that are designed
to change behavior following an infraction of the classroom rules of conduct;
(C) Have a disobedient, disrespectful, violent, abusive,
uncontrollable, or disruptive students removed from his or her classroom for
behavior management supervision;
(D) Assist in enforcing school rules on school property,
while on school-sponsored transportation, or during a school-sponsored
activity;
(E) Request and receive information relating to the
disposition of a student referral to school administration following the
student's violation of classroom rules of conduct or school rules; and
(F) Request and receive immediate assistance in his or her
classroom if a student becomes uncontrollable or in the case of an emergency.
(3) To provide an orderly and safe learning environment for
students, a teacher may:
(A) Request and receive training and other assistance to
improve his or her skills in classroom management, violence prevention,
conflict resolution, and related areas;
(B) Press charges if there is a reason to believe that a
crime has been committed on school property, on school-sponsored
transportation, or during a school-sponsored activity; and
(C) Use reasonable force to protect himself or herself or
others from injury, as authorized under § 5-2-605.
(4) In the event a teacher faces litigation or allegations of
licensure violations for an action taken under subdivision (e)(2) or (e)(3)
of this section, there is a rebuttable presumption that the teacher took
necessary action to restore or maintain the safety or educational atmosphere
of his or her classroom.
03-19-2025 14:28:12 TNL079

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1684
(f)(1) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
promulgate rules to implement this section.
(2) The division shall submit to the House Committee on
Education and the Senate Committee on Education for the House Committee on
Education's review and the Senate Committee on Education's review the
proposed rules required under subdivision (f)(1) of this section.

/s/McAlindon




























03-19-2025 14:28:12 TNL079